District of Columbia statutes.
4-328

Federal participation.

Consistent with federal law, the Department, in connection with the administration of this subchapter and any compact pursuant hereto, shall include in any state plan made pursuant to the Adoption Assistance and Child Welfare Act of 1980 (P.L. 96-272), Titles IV(E) and XIX of the Social Security Act, and any other applicable federal laws, the provision of adoption assistance and medical assistance for which the federal government pays some or all of the cost. The Department shall apply for and administer all relevant federal aid in accordance with law.

June 27, 2000, D.C. Law 13-136, § 408, 47 DCR 2850